Utah statutes.
13-39-302.   Civil action for violation.
(1)  For a violation of Section 13-39-202, an action may be brought by:
(a)  a user of a contact point or domain name registered with the division
under Section 13-39-201; or
(b)  a legal guardian of a user described in Subsection (1)(a).
(2)  In each action under Subsection (1):
(a)  a person described in Subsection (1) may recover the greater of:
(i)  actual damages; or
(ii)  $1,000 for each communication sent in violation of Section 13-39-202;
and
(b)  the prevailing party shall be awarded costs and reasonable attorney fees.
